Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.16.025

Use of force—When unjustified—Victim identity.

A person is not justified in using force against another based on the discovery of, knowledge about, or potential disclosure of the victim's actual or perceived gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, including under circumstances in which the victim made an unwanted nonforcible romantic or sexual advance towards the defendant, or in which the defendant and victim dated or had a romantic or sexual relationship.

[ 2020 c 3 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2020 c 3: See note following RCW 9A.08.040.